Utah statutes.
 	53-6-107.   General duties of council.

(1)  The council shall:

(a)  advise the director regarding:

(i)  the approval, certification, or revocation of certification of any certified academy established in the state;

(ii)  the refusal, suspension, or revocation of certification of a peace officer;

(iii)  minimum courses of study, attendance requirements, and the equipment and facilities to be required at a certified academy;

(iv)  minimum qualifications for instructors at a certified academy;

(v)  the minimum basic training requirements that peace officers shall complete before receiving certification;

(vi)  the minimum basic training requirements that dispatchers shall complete before receiving certification; and

(vii)  categories or classifications of advanced in-service training programs and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements for the categories or classifications;

(b)  recommend that studies, surveys, or reports, or all of them be made by the director concerning the implementation of the objectives and purposes of this chapter;

(c)  make recommendations and reports to the commissioner and governor from time to time; and

(d)  perform other acts as necessary to carry out the duties of the council in this chapter.

(2)  The council may approve special function officers for membership in the Public Safety Retirement System in accordance with Sections 49-14-201 and 49-15-201.

